District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as “Shine Safely Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Compact fluorescent lamp” means a compact low-pressure, mercury-containing,
electric discharge light source in which a fluorescent coating transforms some of the ultraviolet energy
generated by the mercury discharge into visible light, and includes all of the following characteristics:
(A) One base (end cap) of any type, including screw, bayonet, 2 pins, and 4
pins;
(B) Integrally ballasted or non-integrally ballasted;

(C) Light emission between a correlated color temperature of 1700K and
24000K and a Duv of +0.024 and -0.024 in the International Commission on Illumination (“CIE”)
Uniform Color Space (“CAM02-UCS”);
(D) All tube diameters and all tube lengths; and
(E) All lamp sizes and shapes for directional and nondirectional installations,
including: PL, spiral, twin tube, triple twin, 2D, U-bend, and circular.
(2) “Linear fluorescent lamp” means a low-pressure, mercury-containing, electric-
discharge light source in which fluorescent coating transforms some of the ultraviolet energy
generated by the mercury discharge into visible light, and includes all of the following characteristics:
(A) Two bases (end caps) of any type, including single-pin, 2-pin, and recessed
double contact;
(B) Light emission between a correlated color temperature of 1700K and
24000K and a Duv of +0.024 and -0.024 in the CIE CAM02-UCS;
(C) All tube diameters, including, but not limited to, T5, T8, T10, and T12;
(D) All tube lengths from 0.5 to 8.0 feet, inclusive; and
(E) All lamp shapes, including linear, U-bend, and circular.
Sec. 3. Phasing out.
(a) On and after July 1, 2027, it shall be a violation of this act to offer for final sale, sell at final
sale, or distribute in the District as a new manufactured product a screw or bayonet base type compact
fluorescent lamp.
(b) On and after July 1, 2028, it shall be a violation of this act to offer for final sale, sell at
final sale, or distribute in the District as a new manufactured product a pin-base type compact
fluorescent lamp or a linear fluorescent lamp.


(c) This act shall not apply to a lamp:
(1) Designed and marketed exclusively for image capture and projection, including:
(A) Photocopying;
(B) Printing, directly or in preprocesses;
(C) Lithography;
(D) Film or video projection; or
(E) Holography.
(2) Has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and:
(A) With high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two
milliwatts per kilolumen (mW/klm);
(B) For germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA, that emits a peak
radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers;
(C) Designed and marketed exclusively for disinfection or fly trapping from
which either the radiation power emitted between 250 and 315 nanometers represents at least 5
percent of, or the radiation power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20
percent of, the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers;
(D) Designed and marketed exclusively for the generation of ozone, where the
primary purpose is to emit radiation at approximately 185.1 nanometers;
(E) Designed and marketed exclusively for coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from
which the radiation power emitted between 400 and 480 nanometers represents at least 40 percent of
the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(F) Designed and marketed exclusively for use in a sunlamp product, as that
term is defined in 21 C.F.R. § 1040.20(b)(9) in effect on the effective date of act;


(3) Designed and marketed exclusively for use in medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment, or in a medical device;
(4) Designed and marketed exclusively for use in the manufacturing or quality control
of pharmaceutical products;
(5) Designed and marketed exclusively for spectroscopy and photometric applications,
such as UV-visible spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,
nondispersive infrared, Fourier transform infrared, medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness
measurement, process monitoring, or environmental monitoring;
(6) Designed and marketed exclusively for use by academic and research institutions
for conducting research projects and experiments; or
(7) That is a compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle that
was manufactured on or before January 1, 2020.
Sec. 4. Implementation.
(a)(1) The Department of Energy and the Environment (“DOEE”) shall conduct periodic
inspections of distributors or retailers in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this
act.
(2) DOEE shall track all complaints received concerning violations of this act, the
agency’s response to each complaint, and the resolution of each complaint.
(b)(1) If DOEE finds that a person has committed a violation of any provision of this act,
100 DOEE shall issue a Notice of Violation to such person if it is their first violation.
101 (2) A person who commits a second violation shall be subject to a civil penalty of up
102 to $100 for each offense.


103 (3) A person who commits any further violations shall be subject to a civil penalty of
104 not more than $500 for each offense.
105 (c) If a person commits a fifth violation of the provisions of this act, it shall be referred to
106 the Office of the Attorney General, who may institute proceedings in Superior Court to enforce the
107 provisions of this act.
108 (d) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
109 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules
110 to implement the provisions of this act.
111 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
112 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
113 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
114 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
115 Sec. 6. Effective date.
116 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
117 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
118 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
119 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).